test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-2-nitonawîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nitonawîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kinitonâtin # I seek you, I look for you, I search for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: ninitonawâw # I seek him/her, I look for him/her, I search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinitonawin # you seek me, you look for me, you search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kinitonawâw # you seek him/her, you look for him/her, you search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: nitonawîw # he/she seeks another/others, he/she looks for another/others, he/she searches for another/others
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [nitonâkow, nitonâk] # another/others seek him/her, another/others look for him/her, another/others search for him/her

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-nitonâtân # as I seek you, as I look for you, as I search for you
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-nitonawak # as I seek him/her, as I look for him/her, as I search for him/her
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-nitonawiyan # as you seek me, as you look for me, as you search for me
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-nitonawat # as you seek him/her, as you look for him/her, as you search for him/her
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nitonawât # as he/she seeks another/others, as he/she looks for another/others, as he/she searches for another/others
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-nitonâkot # as another/others seek him/her, as another/others look for him/her, as another/others search for him/her

      # Imp
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: nitonawin # (you) seek me now, (you) look for me now, (you) search for me now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: nitonaw # (you) seek him/her now, (you) look for him/her now, (you) search for him/her now
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kinitonâtin # I seek you, I look for you, I search for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: ninitonawâw # I seek him/her, I look for him/her, I search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kinitonâtinâwâw # I seek you all, I look for you all, I search for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: ninitonawâwak # I seek them, I look for them, I search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ninitonâmâwa # I seek another/others, I look for another/others, I search for another/others

      # 2Sg
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinitonawin # you seek me, you look for me, you search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kinitonawâw # you seek him/her, you look for him/her, you search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kinitonawinân # you seek us, you look for us, you search for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kinitonawâwak # you seek them, you look for them, you search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kinitonâmâwa # you seek another/others, you look for another/others, you search for another/others

      # 3Sg
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kinitonawin # you seek me, you look for me, you search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kinitonâk # he/she seeks you, he/she looks for you, he/she searches for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kinitonawinân # you seek us, you look for us, you search for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kinitonâkonaw # he/she seeks you and us, he/she looks for you and us, he/she searches for you and us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kinitonâkowâw # he/she seeks you all, he/she looks for you all, he/she searches for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kinitonawâwak # you seek them, you look for them, you search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kinitonâmâwa # you seek another/others, you look for another/others, you search for another/others
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: nitonâmîw # he/she seeks yet another/others, he/she looks for yet another/others, he/she searches for yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kinitonâtinân # we seek you, we look for you, we search for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: ninitonawânân # we seek him/her, we look for him/her, we search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kinitonâtinân # we seek you all, we look for you all, we search for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: ninitonawânânak # we seek them, we look for them, we search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ninitonâmânâna # we seek another/others, we look for another/others, we search for another/others

      # 12Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kinitonawânaw # we and you seek him/her, we and you look for him/her, we and you search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kinitonawânawak # we and you seek them, we and you look for them, we and you search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinitonâmânawa # we and you seek another/others, we and you look for another/others, we and you search for another/others

      # 2Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kinitonawinâwâw # you all seek me, you all look for me, you all search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kinitonawâwâw # you all seek him/her, you all look for him/her, you all search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kinitonawinân # you all seek us, you all look for us, you all search for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kinitonawâwâwak # you all seek them, you all look for them, you all search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kinitonâmâwâwa # you all seek another/others, you all look for another/others, you all search for another/others

      # 3Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: ninitonâkwak # they seek me, they look for me, they search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kinitonâkwak # they seek you, they look for you, they search for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: ninitonâkonânak # they seek us, they look for us, they search for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kinitonâkonawak # they seek you and us, they look for you and us, they search for you and us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kinitonâkowâwak # they seek you all, they look for you all, they search for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitonawîwak # they seek another/others, they look for another/others, they search for another/others
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: nitonâmîwak # they seek yet another/others, they look for yet another/others, they search for yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ninitonâkothiwa # another/others seek me, another/others look for me, another/others search for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kinitonâkothiwa # another/others seek you, another/others look for you, another/others search for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [nitonâkow, nitonâk] # another/others seek him/her, another/others look for him/her, another/others search for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ninitonâkonâna # another/others seek us, another/others look for us, another/others search for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kinitonâkonawa # another/others seek you and us, another/others look for you and us, another/others search for you and us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kinitonâkowâwa # another/others seek you all, another/others look for you all, another/others search for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [nitonâkowak, nitonâkwak] # another/others seek them, another/others look for them, another/others search for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nitonawîthiwa # another/others seek yet another/others, another/others look for yet another/others, another/others search for yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitonâkothiwa # yet another/others seek another/others, yet another/others look for another/others, yet another/others search for another/others

      # X
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: ninitonâkawin # someone seeks me, someone looks for me, someone searches for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kinitonâkawin # someone seeks you, someone looks for you, someone searches for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: nitonawâw # someone seeks him/her, someone looks for him/her, someone searches for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: ninitonâkawinân # someone seeks us, someone looks for us, someone searches for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kinitonâkawinaw, kinitonâkawinânaw] # someone seeks you and us, someone looks for you and us, someone searches for you and us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kinitonâkawinâwâw # someone seeks you all, someone looks for you all, someone searches for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: nitonawâwak # someone seeks them, someone looks for them, someone searches for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: nitonawâthiwa # someone seeks another/others, someone looks for another/others, someone searches for another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: ninitonâkon # it seeks me, it looks for me, it searches for me
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kinitonâkon # it seeks you, it looks for you, it searches for you
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: nitonâkow # it seeks him/her, it looks for him/her, it searches for him/her
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: ninitonâkonân # it seeks us, it looks for us, it searches for us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kinitonâkonaw # it seeks you and us, it looks for you and us, it searches for you and us
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kinitonâkowâw # it seeks you all, it looks for you all, it searches for you all
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: nitonâkowak # it seeks them, it looks for them, it searches for them
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitonâkothiwa # it seeks another/others, it looks for another/others, it searches for another/others
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-nitonâtân # as I seek you, as I look for you, as I search for you
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-nitonawak # as I seek him/her, as I look for him/her, as I search for him/her
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-nitonâtakwâw # as I seek you all, as I look for you all, as I search for you all
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-nitonawakwâw # as I seek them, as I look for them, as I search for them
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-nitonawaki # as I seek them, as I look for them, as I search for them
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nitonâmak # as I seek another/others, as I look for another/others, as I search for another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-nitonawiyan # as you seek me, as you look for me, as you search for me
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-nitonawat # as you seek him/her, as you look for him/her, as you search for him/her
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-nitonawiyâhk # as you seek us, as you look for us, as you search for us
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-nitonawacik # as you seek them, as you look for them, as you search for them
      PV/î+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-nitonâmat # as you seek another/others, as you look for another/others, as you search for another/others
